Ohio, session 136, HB769.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 4722.01, 4722.03, 4722.06, 4722.07, and 4722.08 be amended and sections 4722.20, 4722.21, 4722.22, 4722.23, 4722.24, 4722.25, and 4722.26 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4722.01. As used in this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code: (A) "Cost–plus contract" means a contract entered into between an owner and a home construction service supplier under which payment to the supplier is based on the cost of a product plus the supplier's rate for labor to install the product plus an agreed percentage of profit or a stipulated fee. (B) "Home construction service" means the construction of a residential building, including the creation of a new structure and the repair, improvement, remodel, or renovation of an existing structure. "Home construction service" does not include construction performed on a structure that contains four or more dwelling units, except for work on an individual dwelling unit within that structure, or construction performed on the common area of a condominium property. (C) "Home construction service contract" means a contract between an owner and a supplier to perform home construction services, including services rendered based on a cost-plus contract, for an amount exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars. (D) "Home construction service supplier" or "supplier" means a person who contracts with an owner to provide home construction services for compensation and who maintains in force a general liability insurance policy in an amount of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars. (E) "Owner" means the person who contracts with a home construction service supplier. "Owner" may include the owner of the property, a tenant who occupies the dwelling unit on which the home construction service is performed, or a person the owner authorizes to act on the owner's behalf to contract for a home construction service, and any other person who contracts for a home construction service. (F) "Residential building" means a one-, two-, or three-family dwelling and any accessory construction incidental to the dwelling. "Residential building" does not include any of the following: (1) An industrialized unit as described in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code; (2) A manufactured home as described in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code; (3) A mobile home as described in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (G) "Workmanlike manner" means the home construction service supplier has engaged in construction that meets or exceeds the minimum quantifiable standards promulgated by the Ohio home builders association. Sec. 4722.03. (A) No home construction service supplier shall do any of the following: (1) Prior to commencing work related to the home construction service, fail to enter into a written contract that complies with this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code; (2) After entering into a contract with an owner and prior to commencing any work that is related to an excess cost, fail to provide an estimate of the excess costs as this chapter requiresrequired by sections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code; (3) After entering into a contract with an owner, do any of the following: (a) Fail to disclose, prior to the owner's acceptance of any goods or work related to an excess cost, that in failing to approve an excess cost, completion of the work may not be possible and a charge may be imposed for any disassembly, reassembly, or partially completed work, which shall be directly related to the actual labor or parts involved; (b) Charge for any excess cost that the owner has not approved; (c) Represent that repairs or work have been performed when such is not the fact; (d) Fail to perform the home construction service in a workmanlike manner; (e) Fail to tender to the owner, within a reasonable time and upon the owner's request, any replaced parts, unless the parts are to be rebuilt or sold by the home construction service supplier, or returned to the manufacturer in connection with a warranted repair or service, and the intended reuse or return is made known to the owner prior to commencing any repair or services; (f) Fail to provide a full refund within a reasonable time period for any goods or services that the home construction service supplier has failed to deliver in accordance with the terms and conditions of the contract required by section 4722.02 of the Revised Code and for which the supplier has received payment; (g) Fail to provide to the owner, within a reasonable time and upon the owner's request, a written, itemized receipt for any item of goods that is left with, or turned over to, the home construction service supplier for repair or services. The receipt shall include all of the following: (i) The identity of the person who will perform the repair or services; (ii) The name and dated signature of the person or representative who actually accepts the goods; (iii) A description, including make and model number or other features that will reasonably identify the goods that are turned over, and the repair or services that are to be performed. (4) Make the performance of any home construction service contingent upon an owner's waiver of any rights this chapter providesprovided by sections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code; (5) Represent that repairs, services, or work is necessary to comply with the residential building code when such is not the fact; (6) Represent that an item of goods or any part thereof that is being inspected or diagnosed for a home construction service is in a dangerous condition, or that its continued use may be harmful, when such is not the fact; (7) Intentionally understate or intentionally misstate the estimated cost of the home construction service; (8) Intentionally misrepresent any aspect of the transaction or the nature or the quality of the work or materials; (9) Fail at the time any owner signs or initials any document to provide the owner with a copy of the document within a reasonable time period; (10) Fail to disclose to the owner prior to the commencement of any repair or service that any part of the repair or service will be performed by a person other than the home construction service supplier or employee of the supplier if the contract disclaims any warranty of the repair or service that the other person performs; (11) Represent that repairs or services must be performed away from the property on which the home construction service is being performed when that is not the fact. (B) A home construction service supplier who enters into a cost-plus contract with an owner for a home construction service need not comply with the requirements regarding excess costs provided in this section. Sec. 4722.06. (A) If, by the attorney general's own inquiries or as a result of complaints, the attorney general has reasonable cause to believe that a person has engaged or is engaging in an act or practice that violates this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code, the attorney general may investigate. (B) For this purpose, the attorney general may administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, adduce evidence, and require the production of relevant matter. If matter that the attorney general requires to be produced is located outside the state, the attorney general may designate representatives, including officials of the state in which the matter is located, to inspect the matter on the attorney general's behalf, and the attorney general may respond to similar requests from officials of other states. The person subpoenaed may make the matter available to the attorney general at a convenient location within the state or pay the reasonable and necessary expenses for the attorney general or the attorney general's representative to examine the matter at the place where it is located, provided that expenses shall not be charged to a party not subsequently found to have engaged in an act or practice violative of this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code. (C) Within twenty days after a subpoena has been served, a motion to extend the return day, or to modify or quash the subpoena, stating good cause, may be filed in the court of common pleas of Franklin county or the county in which the person served resides or has the person's principal place of business. (D) A person subpoenaed under this section shall comply with the terms of the subpoena, unless the parties agree to modify the terms of the subpoena or unless the court has modified or quashed the subpoena, extended the return day of the subpoena, or issued any other order with respect to the subpoena prior to its return day. If a person fails without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena or to produce relevant matter, the attorney general may apply to the court of common pleas of the county in which the person subpoenaed resides or has the person's principal place of business for an order compelling compliance. (E) The attorney general may request that an individual who refuses to testify or to produce relevant matter on the ground that the testimony or matter may incriminate the individual be ordered by the court to provide the testimony or matter. With the exception of a prosecution for perjury and an action for damages under this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code, an individual who complies with a court order to provide testimony or matter, after asserting a privilege against self-incrimination to which the individual is entitled by law, shall not be subjected to a criminal proceeding or to a civil penalty or forfeiture on the basis of the testimony or matter required to be disclosed or testimony or matter discovered through that testimony or matter. (F) The attorney general may: (1) During an investigation under this section, afford, in a manner considered appropriate to the attorney general, a supplier an opportunity to cease and desist from any suspected violation. The attorney general may suspend the investigation during the time period that the attorney general permits the supplier to cease and desist; however, the suspension of the investigation or the affording of an opportunity to cease and desist shall not prejudice or prohibit any further investigation by the attorney general under this section. (2) Terminate an investigation under this section upon acceptance of a written assurance of voluntary compliance from a supplier who is suspected of a violation of this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code. Acceptance of an assurance may be conditioned upon an undertaking to reimburse or to take other appropriate action with respect to identifiable owners damaged by an alleged violation of this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code. An assurance of compliance given by a supplier is not evidence of violation of this chapterthose sections. The attorney general may, at any time, reopen an investigation terminated by the acceptance of an assurance of voluntary compliance, if the attorney general believes that further proceedings are in the public interest. Evidence of a violation of an assurance of voluntary compliance is prima-facie evidence of an act or practice in violation of this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code, if presented after the violation in an action brought under this chapterthose sections. An assurance of voluntary compliance may be filed with the court and if approved by the court, entered as a consent judgment. (G) The procedures available to the attorney general under this section are cumulative and concurrent, and the exercise of one procedure by the attorney general does not preclude or require the exercise of any other procedure. Sec. 4722.07. (A) If the attorney general, by the attorney general's own inquiries or as a result of complaints, has reasonable cause to believe that a supplier has engaged or is engaging in an act or practice that violates this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code, and that the action would be in the public interest, the attorney general may bring any of the following: (1) An action to obtain a declaratory judgment that the act or practice violates this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code; (2)(a) An action, with notice as required by Civil Rule 65, to obtain a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction to restrain the act or practice. If the attorney general shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the supplier has violated or is violating this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code, the court may issue a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction to restrain and prevent the act or practice. (b) On motion of the attorney general, or on its own motion, the court may impose a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars for each day of violation of a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction issued under this section, if the supplier received notice of the action. The civil penalties shall be paid as provided in division (G) of this section. (c) Upon the commencement of an action under division (A)(2) of this section against a supplier who operates under a license, permit, certificate, commission, or other authorization issued by the supreme court or by a board, commission, department, division, or other agency of this state, the attorney general shall immediately notify the supreme court or agency that such an action has been commenced against the supplier. (3) A class action under Civil Rule 23, as amended, on behalf of owners who have engaged in home construction service contracts in this state for damage caused by an act or practice described in this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code. (B) On motion of the attorney general and without bond, in the attorney general's action under this section, the court may make appropriate orders, including appointment of a referee or a receiver, for sequestration of assets, to reimburse owners found to have been damaged, to carry out a home construction service contract in accordance with an owner's reasonable expectations, to strike or limit the application of unconscionable clauses of contracts so as to avoid an unconscionable result, or to grant other appropriate relief. The court may assess the expenses of a referee or receiver against the supplier. (C) Any moneys or property recovered by the attorney general in an action under this section that cannot with due diligence within five years be restored by a referee to owners shall be unclaimed funds reportable under Chapter 169. of the Revised Code. (D) In addition to the other remedies provided in this section, the attorney general may request and the court may impose a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars against the supplier for each violation of an act or practice described in this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code. The civil penalties shall be paid as provided in division (G) of this section. (E) No action may be brought by the attorney general under this section to recover for a home construction service contract more than two years after the occurrence of a violation. (F) If a court determines that provision has been made for reimbursement or other appropriate corrective action, insofar as practicable, with respect to all consumers damaged by a violation, or in any other appropriate case, the attorney general, with court approval, may terminate enforcement proceedings brought by the attorney general upon acceptance of an assurance from the supplier of voluntary compliance with this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code, with respect to the alleged violation. The assurance shall be filed with the court and entered as a consent judgment. A consent judgment is not evidence of prior violation of such chapterthose sections. Disregard of the terms of a consent judgment entered upon an assurance shall be treated as a violation of an injunction issued under this section. (G) Civil penalties ordered pursuant to divisions (A) or (D) of this section shall be paid as follows: one-fourth of the amount to the treasurer of the county in which the action is brought and three-fourths to the consumer protection enforcement fund created by section 1345.51 of the Revised Code. (H) The remedies available to the attorney general under this section are cumulative and concurrent, and the exercise of one remedy by the attorney general does not preclude or require the exercise of any other remedy. (I) In carrying out the attorney general's official duties, the attorney general shall not disclose publicly the identity of any supplier who is or was the subject of an investigation under this chapter sections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code or any facts developed during such an investigation unless those matters have become a matter of public record in enforcement proceedings, or the supplier who is the subject of the investigation gives written consent to public disclosure of those matters. (J) The attorney general shall cooperate with state and local officials, officials of other states, and officials of the federal government in the administration of statutes comparable to this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4722.08. For a violation of Chapter 4722.sections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code, an owner has a cause of action and is entitled to relief as follows: (A) Where the violation was an act prohibited by section 4722.02, 4722.03, or 4722.04 of the Revised Code, the owner may, in an individual action, rescind the transaction or recover the owner's actual economic damages plus an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars in noneconomic damages. (B) In any action for rescission, revocation of the transaction must occur within a reasonable time after the owner discovers or should have discovered the ground for it and before any substantial change in condition of the subject of the transaction. (C) Any owner may seek a declaratory judgment, an injunction, or other appropriate relief against an act or practice that violates this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code. (D) The court may award to the prevailing party a reasonable attorney's fee limited to the work reasonably performed, if either of the following apply: (1) The owner complaining of the act or practice that violated this chapter sections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code has brought or maintained an action that is groundless, and the owner filed or maintained the action in bad faith; (2) The home construction service supplier has knowingly committed an act or practice that violates this chaptersections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code. (E) As used in this section, "actual economic damages" means damages for direct, incidental, or consequential pecuniary losses resulting from a violation of Chapter 4722.sections 4722.01 to 4722.08 of the Revised Code and does not include damages for noneconomic loss as defined in section 2315.18 of the Revised Code. (F) Nothing in this section shall preclude an owner from also proceeding with a cause of action under any other theory of law. Sec. 4722.20. As used in sections 4722.20 to 4722.25 of the Revised Code: (A) "Consumer" means a person who seeks roofing services. (B) "Contractor" means a person engaged in roofing services for a fee or who offers to engage in or solicits roofing services for a fee. "Contractor" does not include any of the following: (1) The owner of a residential or farm property, when the owner performs roofing services on that property; (2) An employee of the owner of a residential or farm property, when the employee performs roofing services on that property; (3) An authorized employee or representative of the United States government, this state, or a political subdivision, when the employee or representative performs roofing services on property owned by that governmental entity; (4) A person who furnishes any fabricated or finished product, material, or article of merchandise that is not incorporated into or attached to real property by the consumer so as to become affixed to the property; (5) A person who is acting as a contractor's employee or as a subcontractor; (6) A person who is performing home construction service as that term is defined in section 4722.01 of the Revised Code; (7) A contractor licensed under Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code. (C) "Employee" means an individual who performs work in exchange for compensation that is reported as income from wages. (D) "Person" includes any individual, partnership, corporation, business, trust, or other legal entity. (E) "Principal business address" does not include a post office box. (F) "Roofing services" means the installation, renovation, repair, maintenance, alteration, or waterproofing of any roof, gutter, downspout, or siding product with regard to a residential premises. (G) "Subcontractor" means a person, other than a contractor's employee, who undertakes, offers to undertake, agrees to perform, or is otherwise awarded a portion of an existing contract by a contractor. Sec. 4722.21. The requirements of this section apply with respect to a contract for roofing services for an amount greater than seven hundred fifty dollars. (A) The contract shall be in writing and shall include all of the following: (1) The complete agreement between the consumer and the contractor, including a clear description of any other documents that are or will be incorporated into the contract; (2) The contractor's full legal name, business names, principal business address, telephone number, and electronic mail address, if available; (3) Either of the following: (a) A description of the contractor's insurance coverage as described in division (A)(1) of section 4722.23 of the Revised Code, including the insurance policy limits, the effective dates of applicable policies, and the name of the insurer; (b) A statement that a description of the contractor's insurance coverage may be accessed at a specific web site or otherwise provided to the consumer on request. (4) An itemized description of the work to be done, the cost of labor, and the materials to be used in performing the contract; (5) The total amount agreed to be paid for the work to be performed under the contract, including all change orders and work orders; (6) A provision allowing payment to be made by cash, check, or credit card, at the consumer's discretion; (7) If the contractor intends to charge a consumer making payment by credit card a credit card processing fee, a provision allowing the contractor to charge the consumer a fee of up to three and one-half per cent of the amount in division (A)(5) of this section; (8) The signatures of all persons party to the contract; (9) In immediate proximity to the space reserved for the consumer's signature, a statement in substantially the following form and in at least ten-point boldface type: "You may cancel this contract not later than the third business day after entering into this contract. If this contract is related to an insurance claim, you may also cancel the contract not later than the third business day after you are notified that your insurer has denied all of a claim or loss related to the contract. See the attached notice of cancellation form for an explanation of this right." (10) A fully completed form in duplicate, captioned "NOTICE OF CANCELLATION," which shall be attached to the contract but easily detachable, and which shall contain the following statement in at least ten-point boldface type: "NOTICE OF CANCELLATION You may cancel this contract not later than the third business day after entering into the contract. If this contract is related to an insurance claim, you may also cancel the contract not later than the third business day after you are notified that your insurer has denied all of your claim or loss. You may cancel the contract by mailing or delivering a signed and dated copy of this cancellation notice or any other written notice to (name of contractor) at (contractor's principal business address) at any time before the applicable deadline. You may also send a cancellation notice through electronic mail if the contractor has provided an electronic mail address. If you cancel, any payments you have made under the contract will be returned to you, less a reasonable charge for any services and materials provided, not later than the fifteenth business day after you send the cancellation notice to the contractor, and any security interest arising out of the transaction will be canceled. You must retain a copy of the cancellation notice. I HEREBY CANCEL THIS TRANSACTION ________________________________ (Date) ________________________________ (Signature)" (B) At the time the contract is signed, the contractor shall provide to the consumer a copy of the contract signed by both the contractor and the consumer. No work shall begin before the contract is signed and a copy of the contract is provided to the consumer. (C) The contract and notice of cancellation required under this section may be delivered and signed electronically in accordance with Chapter 1306. of the Revised Code. (D) Nothing in sections 4722.20 to 4722.25 of the Revised Code requires the consumer's insurer to pay or reimburse the consumer for the fee in division (A)(7) of this section. Sec. 4722.22. (A) A consumer may cancel a contract for roofing services not later than the third business day after the consumer enters into the contract. A consumer who has entered into a contract that is to be paid from the proceeds of a property or casualty insurance policy claim also may cancel the contract not later than the third business day after the consumer receives written notice from the insurer that all of the claim in question is not covered under the insurance policy. (B) A notice of cancellation is not required to be in any particular form and is sufficient if it indicates, by any form of written expression, the consumer's intention not to be bound by the contract. The consumer shall retain a copy of the cancellation notice for a reasonable period of time. (C) A contract is canceled when the consumer gives written notice of cancellation to the contractor at the principal business address or, if applicable, electronic mail address, stated in the contract. If the consumer gives notice of cancellation by mail, the cancellation is effective when the consumer deposits the notice into the United States mail, postage prepaid, and properly addressed to the contractor. (D) Not later than the fifteenth business day after a contract is canceled, the contractor shall tender to the consumer or to the possessor of the residential premises any payments, partial payments, or deposits made by the consumer and any note of indebtedness, except that if the contractor has performed services or provided materials that have been acknowledged by the consumer in writing, the contractor is entitled to the reasonable value of those services or materials. Sec. 4722.23. (A) A contractor shall do both of the following: (1) Obtain both of the following in the name of the contractor and maintain them in full force and effect while the contractor is providing roofing services: (a) Workers' compensation insurance; (b) Contractor liability insurance, including completed operations coverage, in an amount of at least five hundred thousand dollars. (2) Maintain a list of all subcontractors who have performed work under any contract under which the contractor has begun work during the past three years. The list shall include, at a minimum, each subcontractor's full legal name and principal business address. (B) A contractor shall not do any of the following: (1) Advertise, promise to pay, or rebate any portion of an insurance deductible as an inducement to the sale of goods or services, including granting an allowance or offering a discount against the fees to be charged or paying the consumer, or any person directly or indirectly associated with the property in question, any form of compensation, except as permitted under division (B)(2) of this section; (2) Induce the sale of goods or services by doing any of the following: (a) Offering or providing any upgraded work, material, or product not specified in the contract, unless the contractor and the consumer sign a written addendum to the contract that provides for that upgraded work, material, or product; (b) Granting any allowance or offering any discount against the fees to be charged, unless the allowance or discount is specified in the contract or unless the contractor and the consumer sign a written addendum to the contract that provides for that allowance or discount; (c) Paying to the consumer, or to any other person directly or indirectly associated with the property in question, any form of compensation, including a gift, prize, bonus, coupon, credit, referral fee, trade-in or trade-in payment, advertising, or other fee or payment, unless the compensation is specified in the contract or unless the contractor and the consumer sign a written addendum to the contract that provides for that compensation; (3) Require a deposit of more than one-half of the contract price; (4) Abandon or fail to perform, without justification, any ongoing contract or deviate from or disregard plans or specifications in any material respect without the consent of the consumer; (5) Fail to credit the consumer for any payment the consumer has made to the contractor in connection with the contract; (6) Make any material misrepresentation in the procurement of a contract or make any false promise likely to influence, persuade, or induce the procurement of a contract; (7) Violate any applicable state or local building code; (8) Fail to pay for materials or services rendered in connection with operating as a contractor, if the contractor has received sufficient funds as payment for the particular construction work, project, or operation for which the services or materials were rendered or purchased; (9) Report, adjust, or negotiate a claim on behalf of a consumer or receive compensation for referring a claim to any person who reports, adjusts, or negotiates a claim on behalf of a consumer; (10) Fail to possess any insurance required under state, federal, or local laws; (11) Seek or obtain a power of attorney on behalf of a consumer; (12) Represent, negotiate, obtain, or attempt to obtain an assignment of claims, rights, benefits, or proceeds from a consumer; (13) Offer or advertise to represent, negotiate, obtain, or attempt to obtain an assignment of claims, rights, benefits, or proceeds from a consumer; (14) Act as a public insurance adjuster or public insurance adjuster agent on any claim related to an ongoing contract. (C) A contractor may provide information or a professional opinion about a claim directly to a consumer. The contractor may provide information or a professional opinion about a claim in writing directly to the consumer's insurer. (D)(1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a public insurance adjuster or public insurance adjuster agent to do either of the following: (a) Engage in any manner or degree, for compensation of any kind, in the business of repairing, remodeling, or replacing damaged or destroyed property, real or personal, which damage or destruction is covered by a policy of insurance; (b) Have any direct or indirect interest in, or receive compensation of any kind from, any person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation which is engaged in such business. (2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify in any manner the conduct of a public insurance adjuster or public insurance adjuster agent who holds a valid certificate of authority issued under Chapter 3951. of the Revised Code and is acting in compliance with that chapter or any rule adopted under it. Sec. 4722.24. Failure to comply with sections 4722.20 to 4722.23 of the Revised Code constitutes a deceptive act or practice in connection with a consumer transaction in violation of section 1345.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4722.25. Sections 4722.20 to 4722.24 of the Revised Code shall not be construed to limit or diminish any rights or remedies available under sections 1345.21 to 1345.28 of the Revised Code. The contract required under section 4722.21 of the Revised Code shall be deemed to comply with the requirements of divisions (A), (B)(1), (2), and (3) of section 1345.23 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4722.26. It is the intent of the General Assembly in enacting sections 4722.20 to 4722.25 of the Revised Code to establish minimum standards for roofing contracts and to promote fair and honest practices in the roofing services business. Section 2. That existing sections 4722.01, 4722.03, 4722.06, 4722.07, and 4722.08 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. Sections 4722.20, 4722.21, 4722.22, 4722.23, 4722.24, and 4722.25 of the Revised Code, as enacted by this act, take effect on the ninetieth day after the effective date of this section.